Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1757
Issuance of citations for violations; procedure.

(1) The fire chief or head official of the fire department, fire inspectors as may be designated by such fire chief or head official, or inspectors charged with the enforcement of fire, health, safety, and building or construction codes of a city of the metropolitan class, city of the primary class, or city of the first class shall have the authority, after being trained by a certified law enforcement officer in the policies and procedures for issuance of citations, to issue citations for violations of fire, health, safety, and building or construction codes (a) that constitute infractions or violations of city ordinances, (b) that are violations of the fire, health, safety, or building or construction code that the official or inspector issuing the citation is charged with enforcing, and (c) in which the circumstances do not pose a danger to the official or inspector.

(2) If a city of the second class or village has adopted and is enforcing a fire, health, safety, or building or construction code, the fire chief or head official of the fire department, fire inspectors designated by such fire chief or head official, or such inspectors charged with the enforcement of the fire, health, safety, or building or construction code shall have the authority, after being trained by a certified law enforcement officer in the policies and procedures for issuance of citations, to issue citations for violations of fire, health, safety, or building or construction codes (a) that constitute infractions or violations of city or village ordinances, (b) that are violations of the fire, health, safety, or building or construction code that the official or inspector issuing the citation is charged with enforcing, and (c) where the circumstances do not pose a danger to the official or inspector.

(3) A citation issued under this section shall be equivalent to and have the same legal effect as a citation issued in lieu of arrest or continued custody by a peace officer if the citation and procedures utilized meet the requirements of sections 29-422 to 29-429. The citation shall be on the same form prescribed under section 29-423. Failure to appear or comply with a citation issued under this section shall be punishable in the same manner as provided in section 29-426. An official or inspector issuing a citation under this section shall not have authority to take a person into custody or detain a person under this section or section 29-427.

Laws 1998, LB 109, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2004, § 19-4801;

Laws 2006, LB 1175, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 117.